Minnesota, session 2025-2026, HF4364.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF MINNESOTA: Section 1. new text begin [15.0148] COUNCIL ON CENTRAL AND EASTERN EUROPEAN AFFAIRS. new text end new text begin Subdivision 1. new text end new text begin Council established. new text end new text begin The Council on Central and Eastern European Affairs is established to provide representation for Minnesotans from Central and Eastern Europe, some of whom have arrived in the United States as refugees or humanitarian parolees due to war, displacement, or political upheaval. These communities face barriers to accessing government programs and lack a specific community representative to connect citizen input with policy makers. new text end new text begin Subd. 2. new text end new text begin Membership. new text end new text begin (a) Members of the Council on Central and Eastern European Affairs includes public members with ethnic heritage from countries in Central and Eastern Europe, including but not limited to Croatia, Czech Republic, Estonia, Hungary, Kosovo, Latvia, Lithuania, Moldova, Poland, Russia, Romania, Serbia, Slovakia, Slovenia, and Ukraine. new text end new text begin (b) The council shall have 15 voting members consisting of: new text end new text begin (1) 11 public members appointed by the governor who broadly represent Minnesota's Central and Eastern European communities. The council shall include at least five public members who are female. The governor shall ensure the demographic composition of the public members reflects the Central and Eastern European population of Minnesota, including recent immigrants; and new text end new text begin (2) four legislative members with one member appointed by the speaker of the house, one member appointed by the house minority leader, and the Subcommittee on Committees of the Senate Committee on Rules and Administration shall appoint one member from the majority caucus and one member from the minority caucus. The four legislators shall be voting members. new text end new text begin Subd. 3. new text end new text begin Appointments; terms; removal. new text end new text begin (a) In making appointments to the council, the governor shall consider an appointee's proven dedication to the Central and Eastern European community and any expertise beneficial to the council, including public policy, legal affairs, social work, business, or management. new text end new text begin (b) Terms, compensation, and filling of vacancies are as provided in section 15.059. Removal of members is governed by section 15.059, except: (1) a member who missed more than half of the meetings in a 12-month period is automatically removed; and (2) a member appointed by the governor may be removed by a vote of three of the four legislative members of the council. Legislative members serve at the pleasure of their appointing authority. new text end new text begin (c) A member appointed by the governor may serve no more than eight years. A legislator may serve no more than eight consecutive or 12 nonconsecutive years. new text end new text begin Subd. 4. new text end new text begin Training; executive committee; meetings; support. new text end new text begin (a) Members appointed by the governor must attend orientation training within the first six months. The commissioner of administration must arrange training on the legislative process, open meeting law, fiscal management, and human resources. Members who fail to complete the training shall be removed. new text end new text begin (b) The council shall annually elect a chair and other officers from among the governor's appointees. These officers and one legislative member selected by the council shall serve as the executive committee. new text end new text begin (c) Forty percent of voting members in attendance constitutes a quorum. A member may not vote on any action if they have a conflict of interest under section 10A.07. new text end new text begin (d) The commissioner of administration shall provide administrative support under section 16B.371. The council may contract in its own name and apply for and expend grants and gifts, but may not incur debt. new text end new text begin (e) The attorney general shall provide legal services to the council. new text end new text begin Subd. 5. new text end new text begin Executive director; staff. new text end new text begin (a) The Legislative Coordinating Commission (LCC) shall appoint an executive director for the council who serves in the unclassified service at the pleasure of the LCC. new text end new text begin (b) The LCC must establish a process for recruiting and selecting applicants in consultation with the council. new text end new text begin (c) The executive director and the council shall work together on fulfilling duties. new text end new text begin (d) The LCC supervises the executive director. The executive director shall appoint and supervise staff as necessary. new text end new text begin (e) The executive director shall submit the council's biennial budget request to the commissioner of management and budget as provided under chapter 16A. new text end new text begin Subd. 6. new text end new text begin Duties of the council; duties of council members. new text end new text begin (a) The council shall work for the economic, social, legal, and political equality of Central and Eastern European Minnesotans by: new text end new text begin (1) advising the governor and legislature on issues confronting Central and Eastern European communities; new text end new text begin (2) recommending administrative or legislative changes; new text end new text begin (3) serving as a liaison between the state government and Central and Eastern European organizations; new text end new text begin (4) performing or contracting studies on education, employment, health, housing, and related issues; and new text end new text begin (5) collaborating with other ethnic councils on issues of shared concern. new text end new text begin (b) Council members shall attend meetings, maintain communication with their communities, collaborate with the council and executive director, and participate in activities advancing the council's duties. new text end new text begin Subd. 7. new text end new text begin Reports. new text end new text begin The council shall report on measurable outcomes achieved in its strategic plan along with objectives and outcome measures for the coming year. The report shall be submitted by January 15 each year to the chairs and ranking minority members of the legislative committees with primary jurisdiction over state government operations. The biennial budget must be submitted to the LCC by February 1 in each odd-numbered year. new text end Sec. 2. new text begin APPROPRIATION.new text end new text begin $700,000 in fiscal year 2027 is appropriated from the general fund to the Council on Central and Eastern European Affairs for operations, staffing, and outreach. The general fund base for this appropriation is $700,000 in fiscal year 2028. new text end